Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.030

Athletic training advisory committee.

(1) The athletic training advisory committee is formed to further the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The committee consists of five members. Four members of the committee must be athletic trainers licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, must have not less than five years' experience in the practice of athletic training, and must be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. The fifth member must be appointed from the public at large, and have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services.

(3) The committee may provide advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the secretary, such as applications for licenses.

(4) The committee may be requested by the secretary to approve an examination required for licensure under this chapter.

(5) The committee, at the request of the secretary, may recommend rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, relating to standards for appropriateness of athletic training care.

(6) The committee must meet during the year as necessary to provide advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a quorum.

(7) Each member of the committee must be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committee must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of the committee.

(8) The secretary, members of the committee, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 2007 c 253 s 4.]